apertium-sh-mk/apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix.xml
    <pardef n="vrem/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enu</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enom</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enu</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ena</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ime__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nom</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nu</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nima</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="src/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ima</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="jut/ro__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ru</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ro</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rom</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ru</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rima</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rima</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rima</l>
          <r>ro<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="srce"><i>src</i><par n="src/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ime"><i>ime</i><par n="ime__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jutro"><i>jut</i><par n="jut/ro__n"/></e>
